src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ABBO/AMOS !!= @CODE@  comparison for odd-syll adjectives.  Also derivates diminutive and adverbs from the comparisions.
!+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:ap%> K ;
!+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:up%> K ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:abbo%> K ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:ubbo%> K ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:æbbo%> K ; !
                                       +Der1+Der/Comp+A:ap%>        ATTR            ;
                   			     +Use/NG+Der1+Der/Comp+A:up%>        ATTR            ;
                                        +Der1+Der/Comp+A:            ABBO            ;
                                      +Der1+Der/Superl+A:            AMOS            ;

                  +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:appu»sj%>   K-CONS          ;
                      +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:appu»sj%>   ATTR            ;
                         +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:appu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ;
         +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:appu»tj%>it K-CONS          ;
                        +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:appo%>t     K-CONS          ;
                      +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:abmus%>it   K-CONS          ;
														     
                +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:æppo%>t     K-CONS          ; !
              +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:ebmus%>it   K-CONS          ; !
          +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:eppu»sj%>   K-CONS          ; !
          +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:uppu»sj%>   K-CONS          ;
              +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Err/Orth:eppu»sj%>   ATTR            ; !
              +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Err/Orth:uppu»sj%>   ATTR            ;
                 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Err/Orth:eppu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ; !
                 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Err/Orth:uppu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:eppu»tj%>it K-CONS          ; !
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:uppu»tj%>it K-CONS          ;




! Comparative
! -----------

LEXICON BUStem !!= @CODE@ Comparative even-syll, case and attr.
                                 :p        ATTR    ;
                          +Sg+Nom:p        K-CONS  ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bu%>     PxV  ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Gen:bu       K-VOW  ;
                          +Sg+Abe:bu#dagi  K-VOW  ;
                          +Sg+Abe:bu#dagá  K-VOW  ;
                          +Sg+Abe:bu#tagá  K-VOW  ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bu%>     PxV  ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Acc:buv      K-CONS  ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bu%>     PxV  ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Ill:buj      K-CONS  ;
                          +Sg+Ine:bun      K-CONS  ;
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bun%>    PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Ela:bus      K-CONS  ;
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bust%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Com:bujn     K-CONS  ;
                  +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:bujna    K-VOW  ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujn%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                             +Ess:bun      K-CONS  ;
                          +Pl+Nom:bu       K-VOW  ;
                          +Pl+Gen:buj      K-CONS  ;
                          +Pl+Abe:buj#dagi K-VOW  ;
                          +Pl+Abe:buj#dagá K-VOW  ;
                          +Pl+Abe:buj#tagá K-VOW  ;
                          +Pl+Acc:bujt     K-CONS  ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujd%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Pl+Ill:bujda    K-VOW  ;
                          +Pl+Ine:bujn     K-CONS  ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujn%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Pl+Ela:bujs     K-CONS  ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujst%>  PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Pl+Com:buj      K-CONS  ;

LEXICON ABBO !!= @CODE@ Comparative odd-syll, get case and attr. With the dialect differences "-ubbo" and "-æbbo".
! -abbo
         +Sg+Nom:abbo%>       K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Gen:appo%>       K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Abe:appo%>#dagi  K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Abe:appo%>#dagá  K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Abe:appo%>#tagá  K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Acc:appo%>v      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ill:abbu%>j      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ine:appo%>n      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ela:appo%>s      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Com:appu%>jn     K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Com:appo%>jn     K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:appu%>jna    K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:appo%>jna    K-VOW ; !
            +Ess:abbo%>n      K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Nom:appo%>       K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Gen:appo%>j      K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Abe:appo%>j#dagi K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Abe:appo%>j#dagá K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Abe:appo%>j#tagá K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Acc:appo%>jt     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ill:appo%>jda    K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Ine:appo%>jn     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ela:appo%>js     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Com:appo%>j      K-CONS ;
! -ubbo						  K-CONS
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ubbo%>       K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:uppo%>       K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:uppo%>#dagi  K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:uppo%>#dagá  K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:uppo%>#tagá  K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:uppo%>v      K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ubbu%>j      K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:uppo%>n      K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:uppo%>s      K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:uppu%>jn     K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:uppo%>jn     K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:uppu%>jna    K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:uppo%>jna    K-VOW ; !
    +Ess+Err/Orth:ubbo%>n      K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:uppo%>       K-VOW ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:uppo%>j      K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:uppo%>j#dagi K-VOW ;
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:uppo%>j#dagá K-VOW ;
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:uppo%>j#tagá K-VOW ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:uppo%>jt     K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:uppo%>jda    K-VOW ;
 +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:uppo%>jn     K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:uppo%>js     K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:uppo%>j      K-CONS ;
! -æbbo						  K-CONS
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:æbbo%>       K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:æppo%>       K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:æppo%>#dagi  K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:æppo%>#dagá  K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:æppo%>#tagá  K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:æppo%>v      K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:æbbu%>j      K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:æppo%>n      K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:æppo%>s      K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:eppu%>jn     K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:æppo%>jn     K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:eppu%>jna    K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:æppo%>jna    K-VOW ; !
    +Ess+Err/Orth:æbbo%>n      K-CONS ; !
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:æppo%>       K-VOW ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:æppo%>j      K-CONS ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:æppo%>j#dagi K-VOW ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:æppo%>j#dagá K-VOW ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:æppo%>j#tagá K-VOW ; !
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:æppo%>jt     K-CONS ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:æppo%>jda    K-VOW ; !
 +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:æppo%>jn     K-CONS ; !
 +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:æppo%>js     K-CONS ; !
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:æppo%>j      K-CONS ; !


!! ## Superlative
! -----------

LEXICON BUOREMUS !!= @CODE@ Superlative even-syll, get attr and nom case.
                            +Attr:%>  K-CONS            ;
                          +Sg+Nom:%>  K-CONS            ; ! the short form, twol shortens ss#
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:a%> PxV          ; ! ! ! separate nom bec of the short form
                                 :a%> BUOREMUS-OBL ; ! Add -a, directly to the obliques

LEXICON BUOREMUS-OBL
    +Ess:n  K-CONS                    ; ! essive has strong stem
 +Sg+Ill:j  K-CONS                    ; ! so has illative
! +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:s%> PxC ; !^P^ !MARG ! this Px form not mentioned in Spiik
        :Q1 CompSup-EVENWEAKSTEM ; ! These words go like muorra
