src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
dármedibme+A:dármed ABBO/AMOS ;
gåjkes+A+Err/Orth:gåjkkes ABBO/AMOS ;
jalla+A+Err/Orth:jallas ABBO/AMOS ;
